Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-173
Actions against bank on claims inconsistent with records; accrual of cause of action; limitations.

All causes of action against a bank based upon a claim or claims inconsistent with an entry or entries in any bank record or ledger, made in the regular course of business, shall accrue one year after the date of such entry or entries. No action founded upon such a cause shall be brought after the expiration of five years from the date of such accrual.

Laws 1949, c. 10, § 4, p. 71;

Laws 1951, c. 13, § 1, p. 88;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,114;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 73, p. 163;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 70.